Washington statutes.
RCW 43.85.200

Investment deposits and rate of interest—State moneys defined.

All moneys or funds belonging to or in the custody of the state under the control of the state treasurer shall be considered as state moneys or funds.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.85.200. Prior: 1955 c 198 s 2.]